Washington statutes.
RCW 18.51.430

Receivership—Persons qualified to act as receiver.

A petition for receivership shall include the name of the candidate for receiver. The department shall maintain a list of qualified persons to act as receivers, however, no person may be considered to be qualified to be a receiver who:

(1) Is the owner, licensee, or administrator of the facility;

(2) Is affiliated with the facility;

(3) Has a financial interest in the facility at the time the receiver is appointed; or

(4) Has owned or operated a nursing home that has been ordered into receivership.

If a receiver is appointed, he or she may be drawn from the list but need not be, but an appointee shall have experience in providing long-term health care and a history of satisfactory operation of a nursing home. Preference may be granted to persons expressing an interest in permanent operation of the facility.

[ 1989 c 372 s 3; 1987 c 476 s 12.]